Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.100

Records of dealers, shippers—Preservation—Inspection.

Each dealer or shipper shall keep a complete and accurate record of all milk or cream handled by him or her. The record shall be in such form and contain such information as the commission shall prescribe, and shall be preserved for a period of two years, and be submitted for inspection at any time upon request of the commission or its agent.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6061; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.100. Prior: 1959 c 163 s 14; 1939 c 219 s 10; RRS s 6266-10.]